Tables/Contraction/zh-tw.cti
always \u9F1B 13-146-3
always \u9F1C 245-16-5
always \u9F1D 45-3
always \u9F1E 124-1346-3
always \u9F1F 124-1356-3
always \u9F20 24-34-4
always \u9F21 24-34-4
always \u9F22 12345-136-2
always \u9F23 12345-356-5
always \u9F24 123456-2
always \u9F25 135-345-2
always \u9F26 145-246-3
always \u9F27 124-25-2
always \u9F28 1-12346-3
always \u9F29 245-1256-2
always \u9F2A 24-1356-3
always \u9F2B 24-156-2
always \u9F2C 234-5
always \u9F2D 24-156-2
always \u9F2E 124-13456-2
always \u9F2F 34-2
always \u9F30 13-1256-2
always \u9F31 13-13456-3
always \u9F32 1235-123456-2
always \u9F33 13-1256-2
always \u9F34 2345-4
always \u9F35 124-34-2
always \u9F36 15-156-3
always \u9F37 15-16-3
always \u9F38 15-2345-5
always \u9F39 2345-4
always \u9F3A 14-356-2
always \u9F3B 135-16-2
always \u9F3C 246-4
always \u9F3D 245-234-2
always \u9F3E 1235-1236-3
always \u9F3F 34-3
always \u9F40 34-5
always \u9F41 1235-12356-3
always \u9F42 15-16-5
always \u9F43 1235-2346-2
always \u9F44 1-345-3
always \u9F45 15-234-5
always \u9F46 12346-5
always \u9F47 1-345-3
always \u9F48 1345-12346-2
always \u9F49 1345-1346-5
always \u9F4A 245-16-2
always \u9F4B 1-2456-3
always \u9F4C 13-16-5
always \u9F4D 125-156-3
always \u9F4E 13-16-3
always \u9F4F 13-16-3
always \u9F50 245-16-2
always \u9F51 13-16-3
always \u9F52 12-156-4
always \u9F53 12-136-5
always \u9F54 12-136-5
always \u9F55 1235-2346-2
always \u9F56 23456-2
always \u9F57 1456-2
always \u9F58 15-346-5
always \u9F59 135-146-3
always \u9F5A 245-25-5
always \u9F5B 15-346-5
always \u9F5C 125-156-3
always \u9F5D 12-156-3
always \u9F5E 2345-4
always \u9F5F 13-1256-4
always \u9F60 124-246-2
always \u9F61 14-13456-2
always \u9F62 14-13456-2
always \u9F63 12-34-3
always \u9F64 245-45-2
always \u9F65 15-346-5
always \u9F66 1456-2
always \u9F67 1345-346-5
always \u9F68 13-234-5
always \u9F69 246-4
always \u9F6A 12-25-5
always \u9F6B 123-123456-4
always \u9F6C 1256-4
always \u9F6D 12-34-4
always \u9F6E 16-4
always \u9F6F 1345-16-2
always \u9F70 125-2346-2
always \u9F71 125-12356-3
always \u9F72 245-1256-4
always \u9F73 45-4
always \u9F74 2345-4
always \u9F75 1256-2
always \u9F76 2346-5
always \u9F77 25-5
always \u9F78 16-5
always \u9F79 12-156-3
always \u9F7A 125-12356-3
always \u9F7B 145-2345-3
always \u9F7C 12-34-4
always \u9F7D 13-1456-5
always \u9F7E 23456-5
always \u9F7F 12-156-4
always \u9F80 12-136-5
always \u9F81 1235-2346-2
always \u9F82 1456-2
always \u9F83 13-1256-4
always \u9F84 14-13456-2
always \u9F85 135-146-3
always \u9F86 124-246-2
always \u9F87 125-156-3
always \u9F88 1456-2
always \u9F89 1256-4
always \u9F8A 12-25-5
always \u9F8B 245-1256-4
always \u9F8C 25-5
always \u9F8D 14-12346-2
always \u9F8E 1234-1346-2
always \u9F8F 13-12346-3
always \u9F90 1234-1346-2
always \u9F91 2345-4
always \u9F92 14-12346-2
always \u9F93 14-12346-2
always \u9F94 13-12346-3
always \u9F95 123-1236-3
always \u9F96 124-345-5
always \u9F97 14-13456-2
always \u9F98 124-345-5
always \u9F99 14-12346-2
always \u9F9A 13-12346-3
always \u9F9B 123-1236-3
always \u9F9C 13-1246-3
always \u9F9D 245-234-3
always \u9F9E 135-346-3
always \u9F9F 13-1246-3
always \u9FA0 236-5
always \u9FA1 12-1246-3
always \u9FA2 1235-2346-2
always \u9FA3 13-236-2
always \u9FA4 15-346-2
always \u9FA5 1256-5
always \u9FA6 12-1346-2
always \u9FA7 24-34-5
always \u9FA8 1235-2356-2
always \u9FA9 13-1456-5
always \u9FAA 12345-34-5
always \u9FAB 13-1236-5
always \u9FAC 456-4
always \u9FAD 16-5
always \u9FAE 16-5
always \u9FAF 236-5
always \u9FB0 1-156-4
always \u9FB1 15-1456-5
always \u9FB2 123-34-5
always \u9FB3 14-34-5
always \u9FB4 16-4
always \u9FB5 24-12356-4
always \u9FB6 24-1356-3
always \u9FB7 1345-2345-5
always \u9FB8 12345-34-2
always \u9FB9 13-45-5
always \u9FBA 1-25-2
always \u9FBB 14-12456-2
